Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.498

Retirement allowance for members entering system after April 25, 1973, or in lieu of allowance under RCW 41.32.497.

Any person who becomes a member subsequent to April 25, 1973 or who has made the election, provided by RCW 41.32.497, to receive the benefit provided by this section, shall receive a retirement allowance consisting of:

(1) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her additional contributions on full salary as provided by chapter 274, Laws of 1955 and his or her lump sum payment in excess of the required contribution rate made at date of retirement, pursuant to RCW 41.32.350, if any; and

(2) A combined pension and annuity service retirement allowance which shall be equal to two percent of his or her average earnable compensation for his or her two highest compensated consecutive years of service times the total years of creditable service established with the retirement system, to a maximum of sixty percent of such average earnable compensation: PROVIDED, That any member may irrevocably elect, at time of retirement, to withdraw all or a part of his or her accumulated contributions, other than any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), and to receive, in lieu of the full retirement allowance provided by this subsection, a reduction in the standard two percent allowance, of the actuarially determined amount of monthly annuity which would have been purchased by said contributions: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no member may withdraw an amount of accumulated contributions which would lower his or her retirement allowance below the minimum allowance provided by RCW 41.32.497 as now or hereafter amended: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That said reduced amount may be reduced even further pursuant to the options provided in RCW 41.32.530;

(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the retirement allowance payable for service of a member who was state superintendent of public instruction on January 1, 1973 shall be equal to three percent of the average earnable compensation of his two highest consecutive years of service for each year of such service.

[ 1994 c 197 s 16; 1991 c 35 s 55; 1990 c 249 s 4; 1988 c 116 s 1; 1987 c 143 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 199 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 189 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Findings—1990 c 249: See note following RCW 2.10.146.

Effective date—1988 c 116: "This act shall take effect June 30, 1988." [ 1988 c 116 s 2.]

Emergency—Severability—Construction—1974 ex.s. c 199: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Parts of sections as retroactive—1973 1st ex.s. c 189: "Subsection (3) of section 3 of this 1973 amendatory act and the equivalent language contained in the last proviso in section 1 of this 1973 amendatory act, relating to elected and appointed officials, shall be retroactive to January 1, 1973." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 189 s 4.]

Reviser's note: The reference to "subsection (3) of section 3" appears to be erroneous. Section 13 of the original bill (House Bill No. 419) referred to equivalent language in subsection (3) of section 12 and the last proviso in section 4, amending RCW 41.32.497. The language referred to in section 4 remains in section 2 of the final bill which amends RCW 41.32.497, but was deleted by senate committee amendment from section 3 (formerly section 12 of the original bill) of the engrossed substitute bill, codified herein as RCW 41.32.498.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 189: See note following RCW 41.50.215.